src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-abinieks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - abinieks: # Noun 'eng amphibian /fin sammakkoeläin' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/abinieks/ declension_1
     abinieks+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: abinieks
     abinieks+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: abinieka
     abinieks+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: abiniekam
     abinieks+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: abinieku
     abinieks+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: abiniekā
     abinieks+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: abiniek
     abinieks+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: abinieki
     abinieks+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: abinieku
     abinieks+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: abiniekiem
     abinieks+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: abiniekus
     abinieks+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: abiniekos
     abinieks+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: abinieki
